Vermont, session 2025-2026, H730.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 22 is amended to read:
Sec. 22. TIER 3 RULEMAKING
(a) The Land Use Review Board, in consultation with the Secretary of
Natural Resources, shall adopt rules to implement the requirements for the
administration of 10 V.S.A. § 6001(3)(A)(xiii) and 10 V.S.A. § 6001(46) and
(19). It is the intent of the General Assembly that these rules identify critical
natural resources for protection. The Board shall review the definition of Tier
3 area; determine the critical natural resources that shall be included in Tier 3,
giving due consideration to river corridors, headwater streams, habitat
connectors of statewide significance, riparian areas, class A waters, and natural
communities; any additional critical natural resources that should be added to
the definition; measures to ensure that no municipality or region is
disproportionately impacted by Tier 3 designation that would limit reasonable
opportunities for Tier 1 or Tier 2 designations; and how to define the
boundaries. Rules adopted by the Board shall include:
(1) any necessary clarifications to how the Tier 3 definition is used in
10 V.S.A. chapter 151, including whether and how subdivisions would be
covered under the jurisdiction of Tier 3;
VT LEG #385014 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.730
2026 Page 3 of 11
(2) any necessary changes to how 10 V.S.A. § 6001(3)(A)(xiii) should
be administered and when jurisdiction should be triggered to protect the
functions and values of resources of critical natural resources;
(3) the process for how Tier 3 areas will be mapped or identified by the
Agency of Natural Resources and the Board;
(4) other policies or programs that shall be developed to review
development impacts to Tier 3 areas if they are not included in 10 V.S.A.
§ 6001(46); and
(5) if a critical natural resource area is not recommended for protection
under Tier 3, it shall be identified in the rule, and a rationale shall be provided
as to why the critical resource was not selected for Tier 3 protection;
(6) a definition of de minimis residential construction that will not
trigger jurisdiction, which may include installation or improvements to a
wastewater system and installation of a shed less than 200 square feet in size;
and
(7) if a criterion under 10 V.S.A. § 6086 is not recommended for review
under Tier 3, it shall be identified in the rule, and a rationale shall be provided
as to why the criterion is not required for Tier 3 protection.
* * *
(c) The Board shall file a final proposed rule with the Secretary of State
and Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules on or before February 1,
VT LEG #385014 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.730
2026 Page 4 of 11
2026 2027. After the Land Use Review Board files the rule with the
Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules, it shall submit a report
describing the rules and the issues reviewed under this section to the House
Committee on Environment and Energy and the Senate Committee on Natural
Resources and Energy.
(d) During the rule development, the stakeholder group established under
subsection (b) of this section shall solicit participation from representatives of
municipalities and landowners that host Tier 3 critical resource areas on their
properties to determine the responsibilities and education needed to
understand, manage, and interact with the resources.
(e) At least 30 days before a public meeting is going to be held on the
proposed Tier 3 rules, the Board shall mail written notice to every property
owner within a Tier 2 or 3 area and those properties located at or above 2,500
feet in elevation that the property may be subject to the updated Act 250
requirements, including when road construction requires a permit. The notice
shall include information on how the property owner can submit comments on
the draft rules and the date of a public hearing on the rules.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6001(3)(D)(viii)(III) is amended to read:
(III) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, until January July 1, 2027, the construction of a priority housing
project located entirely within areas of a designated downtown development
VT LEG #385014 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.730
2026 Page 5 of 11
district, designated neighborhood development area, or a designated growth
center or within one-half mile around such designated center with permanent
zoning and subdivision bylaws served by public sewer or water services or
soils that are adequate for wastewater disposal. For purposes of this
subdivision (III), in order for a parcel to qualify for the exemption, at least 51
percent of the parcel shall be located within one-half mile of the designated
center boundary. If the one-half mile around the designated center extends into
an adjacent municipality, the legislative body of the adjacent municipal may
inform the Board that it does not want the exemption to extend into that area.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 6081 is amended to read:
§ 6081. PERMITS REQUIRED; EXEMPTIONS
* * *
(z)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary,
no permit or permit amendment is required for any subdivision, development,
or change to an existing project that is located entirely within a Tier 1A area
under section 6034 of this chapter.
* * *
(3) Upon receiving notice and a copy of the permit issued by an
appropriate municipal panel pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 4460(g), a previously
issued permit for a development or subdivision located in a Tier 1A area shall
remain attached to the property. However, neither the Board nor the Agency
VT LEG #385014 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.730
2026 Page 6 of 11
of Natural Resources shall enforce the permit or assert amendment jurisdiction
on the tract or tracts of land unless the designation is revoked or the
municipality has not taken any reasonable action to enforce the conditions of
the permit.
* * *
(dd) Interim housing exemptions.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, until
January July 1, 2027, no permit or permit amendment is required for the
construction of housing projects such as cooperatives, condominiums,
dwellings, or mobile homes, with 75 units or fewer, constructed or maintained
on a tract or tracts of land, located entirely within the areas of a designated new
town center, a designated growth center, or a designated neighborhood
development area served by public sewer or water services or soils that are
adequate for wastewater disposal. Housing units constructed pursuant to this
subdivision shall not count towards the total units constructed in other areas.
This exemption shall not apply to areas within mapped river corridors and
floodplains except those areas containing preexisting development in areas
suitable for infill development as defined in 29-201 of the Vermont Flood
Hazard Area and River Corridor Rule.
(2)(A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, until
July 1, 2027, no permit or permit amendment is required for the construction of
VT LEG #385014 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.730
2026 Page 7 of 11
housing projects such as cooperatives, condominiums, dwellings, or mobile
homes, with 50 or fewer units, constructed or maintained on a tract or tracts of
land of 10 acres or less, located entirely within:
* * *
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, until
January July 1, 2027, no permit or permit amendment is required for the
construction of housing projects such as cooperatives, condominiums,
dwellings, or mobile homes, constructed or maintained on a tract or tracts of
land, located entirely within a designated downtown development district with
permanent zoning and subdivision bylaws served by public sewer or water
services or soils that are adequate for wastewater disposal. Housing units
constructed pursuant to this subdivision shall not count towards the total units
constructed in other areas. This exemption shall not apply to areas within
mapped river corridors and floodplains except those areas containing
preexisting development in areas suitable for infill development as defined in
29-201 of the Vermont Flood Hazard Area and River Corridor Rule.
Sec. 4. 24 V.S.A. § 4460 is amended to read:
§ 4460. APPROPRIATE MUNICIPAL PANELS
* * *
(g)(1) This subsection shall apply to a subdivision or development that:
VT LEG #385014 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.730
2026 Page 8 of 11
(A) was previously permitted pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 151;
(B) is located in a Tier 1A area pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 6034; and
(C) has applied for a permit or permit amendment required by zoning
regulations or bylaws adopted pursuant to this subchapter.
(2) The appropriate municipal panel reviewing a municipal permit or
permit amendment pursuant to this subsection shall include conditions
contained within a permit previously issued pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 151
unless the panel determines that the permit condition pertains to any of the
following:
(A) the construction phase of the project that has already been
constructed;
(B) compliance with another State permit that has independent
jurisdiction;
(C) federal or State law that is no longer in effect or applicable;
(D) an issue that is addressed by municipal regulation and the project
will meet the municipal standards; or
(E) a physical or use condition that is no longer in effect or
applicable or that will no longer be in effect or applicable once the new project
is approved.
VT LEG #385014 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.730
2026 Page 9 of 11
(3) After issuing or amending a permit containing conditions pursuant to
this subsection, the appropriate municipal panel shall provide notice and a
copy of the permit to the Land Use Review Board.
(4) The appropriate municipal panel shall comply with the notice and
hearing requirements provided in subdivision 4464(a)(1) of this title. In
addition, notice shall be provided to those persons requiring notice under
10 V.S.A. § 6084(b) and shall explicitly reference the existing Act 250 permit.
(5) The appropriate municipal panel’s decision shall be issued in
accordance with subsection 4464(b) of this title and shall include specific
findings with respect to its determinations pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
subsection.
(6) Any final action by the appropriate municipal panel affecting a
condition of a permit previously issued pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 151 shall
be recorded in the municipal land records.
(h) Within a Tier 1A area, the appropriate municipal panel shall enforce
any existing permits issued under 10 V.S.A. chapter 151 that has not had its
permit conditions transferred to a municipal permit pursuant to subsection (g)
of this section.
Sec. 5. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 114 is amended to read:
Sec. 114. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, except that:
VT LEG #385014 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.730
2026 Page 10 of 11
(1) Secs. 12 (10 V.S.A. § 6001), 13 (10 V.S.A. § 6086(a)(8)), and 21
(10 V.S.A. § 6001) shall take effect on December 31, 2026 March 1, 2027;
(2) Sec. 19 (10 V.S.A. § 6001(3)(A)(xii)) shall take effect on July 1,
2026 March 1, 2027;
* * *
Sec. 6. APPROPRIATION
In fiscal year 2027, $20,000.00 shall be appropriated from the General Fund
to the Land Use Review Board for the location-based jurisdiction notice
requirement.
Sec. 7. 32 V.S.A. § 3622 is added to read:
§ 3622. PARCELS SUBJECT TO ACT 250 REQUIREMENTS
When determining the appraisal value of a parcel, an assessing official shall
account for any impact on the fair market value of the parcel due to
development requirements under 10 V.S.A. chapter 151.
Sec. 8. PVR GUIDANCE; VALUING PARCELS SUBJECT TO ACT 250
On or before October 1, 2027, the Department of Taxes shall publish
guidance for Vermont assessing officials regarding how to implement the
requirements of 32 V.S.A. § 3622.
VT LEG #385014 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.730
2026 Page 11 of 11
Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, except that Sec. 7 (32 V.S.A. § 3622)
shall take effect on January 1, 2027, and shall first apply to grand lists lodged
on the grand list assessment date in calendar year 2027.
VT LEG #385014 v.4